Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.070

Limitation on purchase of shares by officers, directors, and their associates—Amount.

The number of shares which officers and directors of the converting savings bank and their associates may purchase in the conversion shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the total offering of shares.

[ 1981 c 85 s 13.]